Tennessee, session 114, SB2629.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-303(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new, appropriately designated subdivision:
( ) A member of a uniformed service in active military service of the United
States, as defined in § 58-1-102, who is a resident of this state and stationed out-of-state
under orders of the member's branch of service;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2629
011832
- 1 -